Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-4] Air carrier commission;
establishment. (a) There is established an air carrier commission to
assist in the regulation of interisland air carriers pursuant to the purposes
of this chapter. The commission shall be placed with the department of
transportation for administrative purposes.

(b) The commission shall consist of five
members. The commission shall be appointed in the manner prescribed in section
26-34, except as otherwise provided in this section. The members shall be
appointed for terms of six years each, subject to the advice and consent of the
senate. The terms of the members initially appointed shall be for two, three,
four, five, and six years, respectively, as designated by the governor at the
time of appointment. The governor shall designate a member of the commission
to be chairperson of the commission. Each member shall hold office until the
member's successor is appointed and qualified.

(c) In appointing members, the governor shall
consider persons who have experience in transportation, accounting,
engineering, government, finance, law, or other similar fields. No person
owning any stock or bonds of any Hawaii air carrier or of any common carrier by
air, or having any interest in, or deriving any remuneration from, any Hawaii
air carrier or any common carrier by air shall be appointed as a commissioner;
provided that any person who has retired from the service of, and no longer
holds any position with, any common carrier or Hawaii air carrier may be
eligible for appointment.

(d) The members of the commission shall
receive no compensation for their services on the commission, but shall be
reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the
performance of their duties. [L Sp 2008, c 1, pt of §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (b) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next